Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS OF CONDUCT; PEACE OFFICERS REQUIRED TO COOPERATE WITH CERTAIN INVESTIGATIONS.new text end new text begin The Peace Officer Standards and Training Board must revise the peace officer standards of conduct that the board is mandated to publish and update under Minnesota Statutes, section 626.843, subdivision 1, clause (6), to require peace officers to cooperate with investigations when a law enforcement agency that does not employ the officer is conducting an investigation into an incident involving the use of force by a peace officer and the officer required to cooperate in the investigation is not the subject of the investigation or otherwise accused of wrongdoing in the matter under investigation. A peace officer who cooperates with an investigation as required by this provision is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might result from statements or admissions made while cooperating in the investigation. new text end